North Carolina, session 2025, SB858.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 164-14 reads as rewritten:
"§ 164-14. Membership; appointments; terms; vacancies.
(a) The Commission shall consist of 13 14 members, who shall be appointed as follows:
…
(14) One member, by the dean of the school of law of High Point University.
(b) Repealed by Session Laws 2019-76, s. 32.1, effective July 1, 2019.
(c) Appointments by the president of the North Carolina State Bar, the General Statutes
Commission, and the deans of the schools of law of North Carolina Central University, Duke
University, Elon University, the University of North Carolina, and Wake Forest University shall
be made in the even-numbered years, and appointments made by the Speaker of the House of
Representatives, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, the president of the North Carolina
Bar Association, the dean deans of the school schools of law of Campbell University, University
and High Point University, and the Governor shall be made in the odd-numbered years.
Appointments shall be made for two-year terms beginning September 1 of the year when the
appointments are to become effective and expiring August 31 two years thereafter.
…
(f) Notwithstanding the expiration of the term of the appointment, the terms of members
of the General Statutes Commission shall continue until the appointment of a successor has been
made and reported to the secretary of the Commission."
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding G.S. 164-14(c), as amended by Section 1 of this act,
the term of the initial appointment by the dean of the school of law of High Point University shall
begin September 1, 2026, and end August 31, 2029.
*S858-v-2*

SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law.
In the General Assembly read three times and ratified this the 18th day of June, 2026.
s/ Rachel Hunt
President of the Senate
s/ Donna McDowell White
Presiding Officer of the House of Representatives
_____________________________________
Josh Stein
Governor
Approved __________.m. this ______________ day of ___________________, 2026
Page 2 Senate Bill 858-Ratified